Missouri, session 2026, HB2157.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 162, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 162.059, to read as follows:
162.059. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Released-Time Education Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Parent", a parent, legal guardian, or other person having control, custody,
or charge of a child;
(2) "Released-time course", a course in religious instruction taught by an
independent sponsoring entity that a student is excused from school to attend;
(3) "School district", the same definition as in section 160.011.
3. A school district shall adopt a policy as provided in this section to excuse a
student from school to attend a released-time course. Such policy shall not interfere
with the ability of a student's parent to request or access a released-time course for the
student.
4. A school district shall, upon the request of a student's parent, excuse a student
under its jurisdiction from school to attend a released-time course for at least one hour
per week but not more than five hours per week if the following requirements are met:
(1) The student's parent gives written consent for the student to attend the
released-time course;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2157 2
(2) The entity sponsoring the released-time course maintains attendance records
and makes them available to the school district the student attends;
(3) Transportation to and from the place of instruction including, but not limited
to, transportation for students with disabilities, is the complete responsibility of the
sponsoring entity, parent, or student;
(4) The sponsoring entity makes provisions for and assumes liability for the
student while under the control of the sponsoring entity;
(5) No school district moneys other than de minimis administrative costs are
expended in providing the released-time course;
(6) Released-time courses shall not be held on school district property unless
permitted under a neutral policy of equal access opening school district property for use
by community groups; and
(7) The student assumes responsibility for any missed schoolwork.
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any period for
which a student is excused to attend a released-time course shall be considered as the
student attending the public school from which the student is excused for the purposes
of calculating state aid for such school and satisfying attendance requirements.
6. No provision of this section shall be construed to deny a released-time course
or the sponsoring entity equal access to moneys, benefits, or services that the school
district provides or makes available to community groups or other independent entities.
7. (1) A school district shall adopt a policy that awards academic credit for the
completion of a released-time course and recognizes the credits of an independently
accredited provider of released-time courses.
(2) In determining how much credit to award for completion of such a course,
the school district shall evaluate the course based on purely secular criteria that are
substantially the same criteria used to evaluate similar courses for purposes of
determining how much credit to award for such course. The decision to award credit
for a released-time course shall be neutral to, and shall not involve any test for, religious
content or denominational affiliation.
(3) For purposes of this section, secular criteria include, but are not limited to,
the following:
(a) The number of hours of classroom instruction time;
(b) A review of the course syllabus that reflects course requirements and
materials used;
(c) The methods of assessment used in the course; and
(d) The qualifications of the course instructor.

HB 2157 3
8. Any person or organization aggrieved by a violation of this section may bring
an action against the school district responsible for the violation and seek appropriate
relief including, but not limited to, injunctive relief, monetary damages, reasonable
attorney's fees, and court costs.
✔